Utah statutes.
11-42-604.   Notice regarding resolution or ordinance authorizing interim warrants or bond anticipation notes -- Complaint contesting warrants or notes -- Prohibition against contesting warrants and notes.

(1)  A local entity may publish notice, as provided in Subsection (2), of a resolution or ordinance that the governing body has adopted authorizing the issuance of interim warrants or bond anticipation notes.

(2) (a)  If a local entity chooses to publish notice under Subsection (1)(a), the notice shall:

(i)  be published:

(A)  in a newspaper of general circulation within the local entity; and

(B)  as required in Section 45-1-101; and

(ii)  contain:

(A)  the name of the issuer of the interim warrants or bond anticipation notes;

(B)  the purpose of the issue;

(C)  the maximum principal amount that may be issued;

(D)  the maximum length of time over which the interim warrants or bond anticipation notes may mature;

(E)  the maximum interest rate, if there is a maximum rate; and

(F)  the times and place where a copy of the resolution or ordinance may be examined, as required under Subsection (2)(b).

(b)  The local entity shall allow examination of the resolution or ordinance authorizing the issuance of the interim warrants or bond anticipation notes at its office during regular business hours.

(3)  Any person may, within 30 days after publication of a notice under Subsection (1), file a verified, written complaint in the district court of the county in which the person resides, contesting the regularity, formality, or legality of the interim warrants or bond anticipation notes issued by the local entity or the proceedings relating to the issuance of the interim warrants or bond anticipation notes.

(4)  After the 30-day period under Subsection (3), no person may contest the regularity, formality, or legality of the interim warrants or bond anticipation notes issued by a local entity under the resolution or ordinance that was the subject of the notice under Subsection (1), or the proceedings relating to the issuance of the interim warrants or bond anticipation notes.

